Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-422
Lottery or raffle; restriction on gross proceeds; violation; penalty.

No person, except a licensed organization operating pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, shall conduct any lottery or raffle with gross proceeds greater than fifteen thousand dollars. Any lottery or raffle conducted in violation of this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any lottery conducted in accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, any lottery by the sale of pickle cards conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, or any lottery game conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act.

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 63;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-199;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 143;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 52;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 2.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.